Utah statutes.
73-18-20.2.   Defaced, altered, or obliterated identification or serial number -- Release of vessel.

If the hull identification number or serial number for the engine or outboard motor of a vessel seized under Section 73-18-20.1 has been defaced, altered, or obliterated, the vessel may not be released until:

(1)  the original manufacturer's hull identification number or engine or outboard motor serial number has been replaced; or

(2)  a new number assigned by the division or its authorized agent has been provided and has been affixed to the vessel, engine, or outboard motor.



Amended by Chapter 202, 2001 General Session

